Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.667, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Permits and notice; requirements. (a) Before killing or arranging to kill a beaver under this section, the road authority or government unit must contact a conservation officer for a special beaver permit if the beaver will be killed within two weeks before or after the trapping season for beaver, and the conservation officer must issue the permit for any beaver subject to this section. A permit is not required: (1) for a licensed trapper during the open trapping season for beaver; or (2) when the trapping season for beaver is closed and it is not within two weeks before or after the trapping season for beaver. (b) A road authority or government unit that kills or arranges to have killed a beaver under this section must notify a conservation officer or employee of the Fish and Wildlife Division within ten days after the animal is killed. (c) Unless otherwise directed by a conservation officer, the road authority, local government unit, the landowner, or their agent may dispose of or retain beaver killed under this section. deleted text begin Human consumption of a retained beaver is prohibited.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end